Hawaii statutes.
[§201H-21] Duty to make reports.
Except as otherwise provided by law, the corporation shall:

(1) File at least once a year with the governor a
report of its activities for the preceding fiscal year;

(2) Report to the state comptroller on moneys deposited
in depositories other than the state treasury under section 40-81 and rules
adopted thereunder; and

(3) Submit an annual report to the legislature on all
corporation program areas and funds organized by program area, and by fund
within each program area, no later than twenty days prior to the convening of
each regular session, which shall provide the following information on the
status of its programs and finances:

(A) A description of programs being developed
in the current fiscal biennium, including a summary listing of the programs,
the status of each program, the methods of project financing or loans, and
other information deemed significant;

(B) A description of programs planned for
development during the two ensuing fiscal bienniums, including a summary
listing of the proposed programs, the methods of project financing or loans,
and other information deemed significant;

(C) A status report of actual expenditures
made in the prior completed fiscal year from each fund established under this
chapter, estimated expenditures anticipated for the current fiscal year, and
projected expenditures for the ensuing fiscal years to be described in relation
to specific projects developed to implement the purposes of any program or fund
established under this chapter;

(D) A financial audit and report conducted on
an annual basis by a certified public accounting firm; and

(E) Recommendations with reference to any
additional legislation or other action that may be necessary to carry out the
purposes of this [chapter]. [L 2005, c 196, pt of §20; am L 2006, c 180, §15]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next